project/egy_lex/verb.lexc
!!!verb.lexc!!!

LEXICON Root
Verb;

LEXICON VerbNeg1
+ش:^ش VerbNeg2;

LEXICON VerbNeg2
ما+:ما^ VerbNeg3;
م+:م^ VerbNeg3;
LEXICON VerbNeg3
0:0 #;
ب+:ب^ #;
ح+:ح^ #;
LEXICON VerbInf
0:0 #;
0:0 VerbNeg1;

ب+:ب^ #; !habitual
ح+:ح^ #; !future
!Add pronoun clitics

LEXICON Verb
تذاضغ VerbInf;
اننظث VerbInf;
اصتنق VerbInf;
غصص VerbInf;
استلصث VerbInf;
تظافخ VerbInf;
اناثق VerbInf;
اثدف VerbInf;
ادزخ VerbInf;
انضشث VerbInf;
ااضط VerbInf;
اجتفش VerbInf;
شارر VerbInf;
استفخو VerbInf;
تتصش VerbInf;
انزاظ VerbInf;
اجعز VerbInf;
اصترظ VerbInf;
قذص VerbInf;
تزاثت VerbInf;
ستص VerbInf;
قارج VerbInf;
امتظث VerbInf;
استبك VerbInf;
استثرك VerbInf;
انفكظ VerbInf;
اتهغ VerbInf;
اقبب VerbInf;
تواحع VerbInf;
استفذذ VerbInf;
استثطف VerbInf;
انلاد VerbInf;
تااحث VerbInf;
تزشل VerbInf;
استتخش VerbInf;
اوسد VerbInf;
تمتخ VerbInf;
تشهح VerbInf;
اضخل VerbInf;
تعاقي VerbInf;
اهعغ VerbInf;
شهظ VerbInf;
تقاذش VerbInf;
تتبى VerbInf;
راهت VerbInf;
تشكط VerbInf;
ارظغ VerbInf;
استعطذ VerbInf;
انغقز VerbInf;
تذفخ VerbInf;
اغتعث VerbInf;
تثاتط VerbInf;
خاقر VerbInf;
ساذت VerbInf;
ثجج VerbInf;
تهاخز VerbInf;
داتص VerbInf;
انطفع VerbInf;
استضذس VerbInf;
اعنه VerbInf;
تثد VerbInf;
تستد VerbInf;
تناقت VerbInf;
تجاخ VerbInf;
اعثث VerbInf;
تغصف VerbInf;
اتتضو VerbInf;
تفاغم VerbInf;
بشب VerbInf;
استمر VerbInf;
استجرص VerbInf;
ابتذح VerbInf;
مانت VerbInf;
تفلل VerbInf;
استضدك VerbInf;
تضهض VerbInf;
اقتسح VerbInf;
هاذء VerbInf;
انحضح VerbInf;
ابهخ VerbInf;
ثبي VerbInf;
استمظغ VerbInf;
باثظ VerbInf;
ازتكم VerbInf;
انغطس VerbInf;
باشع VerbInf;
اكلك VerbInf;
تزاظذ VerbInf;
انهلق VerbInf;
ااثظ VerbInf;
اناكي VerbInf;
ءفن VerbInf;
ناض VerbInf;
ايتقم VerbInf;
تفابل VerbInf;
انسعض VerbInf;
لخء VerbInf;
امزذ VerbInf;
استمصت VerbInf;
تخحط VerbInf;
تسجي VerbInf;
شثش VerbInf;
اصتعش VerbInf;
تعادق VerbInf;
تثادو VerbInf;
دلص VerbInf;
اندخح VerbInf;
جزج VerbInf;
انورز VerbInf;
اهذء VerbInf;
تتاسر VerbInf;
استجقد VerbInf;
ااتده VerbInf;
استظجى VerbInf;
رازح VerbInf;
عانع VerbInf;
طااخ VerbInf;
ابتوخ VerbInf;
تشاعى VerbInf;
تناثم VerbInf;
فادل VerbInf;
اجتكس VerbInf;
اظصي VerbInf;
فانم VerbInf;
ءصث VerbInf;
اطتكف VerbInf;
استصنج VerbInf;
خفح VerbInf;
انوهج VerbInf;
انذتص VerbInf;
مظط VerbInf;
ادتبن VerbInf;
ذطط VerbInf;
غقف VerbInf;
يعر VerbInf;
ناذء VerbInf;
انايج VerbInf;
اظشخ VerbInf;
طاظق VerbInf;
تظشث VerbInf;
تراكع VerbInf;
تعغط VerbInf;
ظكث VerbInf;
اصتكذ VerbInf;
اكخم VerbInf;
تهاظط VerbInf;
اعشم VerbInf;
اختكو VerbInf;
احخط VerbInf;
انجضض VerbInf;
تهذل VerbInf;
تيسب VerbInf;
استشفر VerbInf;
تخافن VerbInf;
ساك VerbInf;
شابز VerbInf;
تظضز VerbInf;
تخرض VerbInf;
تبهص VerbInf;
اصلذ VerbInf;
استخلج VerbInf;
انضظد VerbInf;
استسظخ VerbInf;
ارتان VerbInf;
تهرب VerbInf;
استولي VerbInf;
صارخ VerbInf;
استحخخ VerbInf;
الشء VerbInf;
اعلك VerbInf;
مالس VerbInf;
استرعج VerbInf;
ليد VerbInf;
اقيذ VerbInf;
تااسع VerbInf;
توقل VerbInf;
استدعم VerbInf;
ودخ VerbInf;
تماعع VerbInf;
استسهب VerbInf;
تعقو VerbInf;
مظن VerbInf;
تضاغ VerbInf;
اعتدي VerbInf;
خابك VerbInf;
ايتش VerbInf;
ازهء VerbInf;
انذضب VerbInf;
استيحن VerbInf;
الذت VerbInf;
انهضك VerbInf;
باغج VerbInf;
تلغج VerbInf;
تزاصق VerbInf;
انضرس VerbInf;
تثشم VerbInf;
وقغ VerbInf;
ذافو VerbInf;
تزاغر VerbInf;
اذعز VerbInf;
تتني VerbInf;
جاتب VerbInf;
ابطك VerbInf;
استصقو VerbInf;
ابتيظ VerbInf;
التزس VerbInf;
افتهح VerbInf;
انداخ VerbInf;
تخاضظ VerbInf;
اظضظ VerbInf;
استظغخ VerbInf;
ايمص VerbInf;
اننطس VerbInf;
اضتكر VerbInf;
تفسش VerbInf;
تهانن VerbInf;
تنعز VerbInf;
تحازز VerbInf;
جرخ VerbInf;
اوذض VerbInf;
ادتعج VerbInf;
انيرر VerbInf;
احلف VerbInf;
استذغص VerbInf;
هاسث VerbInf;
استعكى VerbInf;
ياتح VerbInf;
هااه VerbInf;
ذيش VerbInf;
تلعل VerbInf;
اهتيو VerbInf;
انغبر VerbInf;
استخهه VerbInf;
صفج VerbInf;
انعثظ VerbInf;
اندغظ VerbInf;
اريل VerbInf;
اضتقز VerbInf;
تكاقغ VerbInf;
اخترو VerbInf;
هيث VerbInf;
تراصه VerbInf;
اجات VerbInf;
استوصء VerbInf;
اغلن VerbInf;
اظغض VerbInf;
انزعط VerbInf;
ايفص VerbInf;
تصكذ VerbInf;
اظضص VerbInf;
صاهط VerbInf;
استودز VerbInf;
ذاوب VerbInf;
اطتكذ VerbInf;
انغاع VerbInf;
سافش VerbInf;
تثابر VerbInf;
تياخي VerbInf;
اونو VerbInf;
اوظق VerbInf;
استاحح VerbInf;
استذلع VerbInf;
استلرظ VerbInf;
تذنو VerbInf;
دات VerbInf;
غادض VerbInf;
وبس VerbInf;
اطبء VerbInf;
اوجض VerbInf;
استجزر VerbInf;
انضذن VerbInf;
ازنف VerbInf;
تقاثص VerbInf;
ارتنر VerbInf;
تساثق VerbInf;
اعتلض VerbInf;
تعامف VerbInf;
استرشب VerbInf;
عاذذ VerbInf;
انزوز VerbInf;
تزمء VerbInf;
انيمط VerbInf;
استهحض VerbInf;
ثاغح VerbInf;
انهقو VerbInf;
ثزت VerbInf;
اضتزو VerbInf;
تغصك VerbInf;
تذابغ VerbInf;
انطظك VerbInf;
تبم VerbInf;
غضج VerbInf;
تغبط VerbInf;
تخاعو VerbInf;
باكى VerbInf;
تطاعم VerbInf;
احظف VerbInf;
ارتك VerbInf;
انطذى VerbInf;
تحمغ VerbInf;
استرصذ VerbInf;
ثااد VerbInf;
تبازى VerbInf;
استجند VerbInf;
انركك VerbInf;
استهلك VerbInf;
طاحج VerbInf;
عايظ VerbInf;
استورذ VerbInf;
تهرص VerbInf;
تذوف VerbInf;
توظ VerbInf;
تضالق VerbInf;
تطبذ VerbInf;
تدعذ VerbInf;
اعتقق VerbInf;
انصح VerbInf;
انصضر VerbInf;
تكء VerbInf;
مادف VerbInf;
انعكذ VerbInf;
انضره VerbInf;
امتتظ VerbInf;
تاذب VerbInf;
ناتغ VerbInf;
يغح VerbInf;
تماثه VerbInf;
انذحظ VerbInf;
اندكذ VerbInf;
ايرد VerbInf;
تراشك VerbInf;
اختصد VerbInf;
استعرث VerbInf;
طغط VerbInf;
ظلخ VerbInf;
استهذع VerbInf;
صادش VerbInf;
انومل VerbInf;
احتجل VerbInf;
ااتعب VerbInf;
انمرد VerbInf;
ازشظ VerbInf;
انوفل VerbInf;
ثوم VerbInf;
انهخق VerbInf;
استزر VerbInf;
انعشس VerbInf;
وزه VerbInf;
انتاك VerbInf;
شقظ VerbInf;
اعدح VerbInf;
تااز VerbInf;
اكتصي VerbInf;
انسطع VerbInf;
اتذك VerbInf;
انلسح VerbInf;
تخضز VerbInf;
استضشع VerbInf;
استغدث VerbInf;
يسب VerbInf;
ايحخ VerbInf;
اصتبت VerbInf;
ازبي VerbInf;
اكضث VerbInf;
حطم VerbInf;
انقنط VerbInf;
انحيج VerbInf;
ارطغ VerbInf;
تفاكم VerbInf;
فابف VerbInf;
تصاهض VerbInf;
استشذغ VerbInf;
اذبش VerbInf;
احتعف VerbInf;
ادضذ VerbInf;
تياضد VerbInf;
ايتنس VerbInf;
انحزط VerbInf;
استعنن VerbInf;
استغسى VerbInf;
تفارم VerbInf;
استثوء VerbInf;
انضمج VerbInf;
ظشب VerbInf;
بخز VerbInf;
تضزظ VerbInf;
وظم VerbInf;
استذلق VerbInf;
استرضش VerbInf;
تعجط VerbInf;
لاوز VerbInf;
استبجث VerbInf;
استضمب VerbInf;
اثنض VerbInf;
انكخي VerbInf;
اخقض VerbInf;
اوتدك VerbInf;
اتتجي VerbInf;
ظفي VerbInf;
تحخك VerbInf;
تهلن VerbInf;
استتغت VerbInf;
احتطش VerbInf;
ساقي VerbInf;
تخول VerbInf;
ءاغر VerbInf;
حظل VerbInf;
تنمى VerbInf;
اوخس VerbInf;
افتظز VerbInf;
اختوض VerbInf;
وكك VerbInf;
اتتاق VerbInf;
انثغس VerbInf;
اختسق VerbInf;
ارفح VerbInf;
اطتتص VerbInf;
زاتت VerbInf;
استسزك VerbInf;
اقتتض VerbInf;
فاقى VerbInf;
اعتلز VerbInf;
اتتسط VerbInf;
طاقه VerbInf;
تناصف VerbInf;
ثري VerbInf;
تكانس VerbInf;
استدظل VerbInf;
انسند VerbInf;
استخود VerbInf;
زاشظ VerbInf;
شظم VerbInf;
تنشج VerbInf;
تجاضذ VerbInf;
استغقي VerbInf;
ادترف VerbInf;
اثام VerbInf;
استغصج VerbInf;
اصكح VerbInf;
صبذ VerbInf;
سضف VerbInf;
استشست VerbInf;
اخحل VerbInf;
احتجض VerbInf;
ذاجر VerbInf;
اتتنط VerbInf;
استخثس VerbInf;
احتفض VerbInf;
ازكج VerbInf;
اهتاز VerbInf;
هالط VerbInf;
استبدع VerbInf;
تياحه VerbInf;
اغرث VerbInf;
لاجص VerbInf;
استشجج VerbInf;
تفابح VerbInf;
ناضى VerbInf;
اندثء VerbInf;
هقل VerbInf;
ظانم VerbInf;
اخجض VerbInf;
قصج VerbInf;
انحزف VerbInf;
انهفظ VerbInf;
قاطد VerbInf;
استمضو VerbInf;
انادغ VerbInf;
تثلن VerbInf;
استصزك VerbInf;
اايد VerbInf;
انقرى VerbInf;
قاهب VerbInf;
تشاتد VerbInf;
تضاكش VerbInf;
انعجء VerbInf;
ازصظ VerbInf;
اندته VerbInf;
اثغت VerbInf;
اذمت VerbInf;
هاول VerbInf;
استهفص VerbInf;
اطتذه VerbInf;
انتظل VerbInf;
اطترق VerbInf;
ظاطق VerbInf;
ضاشص VerbInf;
استقخء VerbInf;
استخسث VerbInf;
كالص VerbInf;
استرفت VerbInf;
تسقش VerbInf;
ادزل VerbInf;
تغرش VerbInf;
شعذ VerbInf;
تجيل VerbInf;
اظنه VerbInf;
انرهص VerbInf;
لاغو VerbInf;
ساثه VerbInf;
اوين VerbInf;
امتضج VerbInf;
ءاثظ VerbInf;
انلاى VerbInf;
ظشج VerbInf;
انحشل VerbInf;
تخاشر VerbInf;
تظمع VerbInf;
تااكس VerbInf;
اصتد VerbInf;
انصرر VerbInf;
تليث VerbInf;
استلرص VerbInf;
انظذف VerbInf;
تضازت VerbInf;
لغن VerbInf;
اظتسي VerbInf;
استصهس VerbInf;
تباخب VerbInf;
ناضث VerbInf;
ازتبخ VerbInf;
انزطظ VerbInf;
اجكخ VerbInf;
اارص VerbInf;
انخبف VerbInf;
ايكل VerbInf;
انسوش VerbInf;
صاضي VerbInf;
اضصف VerbInf;
تمقك VerbInf;
استهش VerbInf;
تخغش VerbInf;
يادى VerbInf;
تثاهط VerbInf;
التزت VerbInf;
تجصن VerbInf;
تماحء VerbInf;
انعجه VerbInf;
استعشن VerbInf;
استزبو VerbInf;
ذاعن VerbInf;
انزي VerbInf;
احتتر VerbInf;
ثتن VerbInf;
تحتش VerbInf;
نجص VerbInf;
ادحب VerbInf;
تكيك VerbInf;
تتغك VerbInf;
حزد VerbInf;
انيسذ VerbInf;
